Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-219.04
Barber shop or school; reinspection; fees.

When it is necessary for an inspector to reinspect a barber shop or barber school to determine if a violation has been corrected, there shall be a fee assessed to the barber, barber shop owner, instructor, or barber school owner for the first, second, and third callback inspection. The fees shall be an amount set by the board.

Laws 1983, LB 87, § 13;

Laws 1997, LB 622, § 93.